dictsource/he_rules
.group שׁ
      שׁ S
      _) שְׁ Se
      _) שְׁ (_ Se
      שְׁ (_ S
      %) שְׁ (% S
      @) שְׁ (% Se
      שָׁ (% Sa
      שָׁא Sa?
      שָׁב Sav
      שָׁג Sag
      שָׁד Sad
      שָׁה Sah
      שָׁו Sav
      שָׁז Saz
      שָׁח Sax
      שָׁט Sat
      שָׁי Saj
      שָׁכ SaX
      שָׁך (_ SaX||
      שָׁל Sal
      שָׁמ Sam
      שָׁם (_ Sam||
      שָׁנ San
      שָׁן (_ San||
      שָׁס Sas
      שָׁע Sa?
      שָׁפ Saf
      שָׁף (_ Saf||
      שָׁצ Sats
      שָׁץ (_ Sats||
      שָׁק Sak
      שָׁר SaQ
      שָׁש SaS
      שָׁשׁ SaS
      שָׁשׂ Sas
      שָׁת Sat
      שָׁאּ Sa?'
      שָׁבּ SaB'
      שָׁגּ Sag'
      שָׁדּ Sad'
      שָׁהּ Sah'
      שָׁוּ Sav'
      שָׁזּ Saz'
      שָׁחּ Sax'
      שָׁטּ Sat'
      שָׁיּ Saj'
      שָׁכּ Sak'
      שָׁךּ (_ Sak'||
      שָׁלּ Sal'
      שָׁמּ Sam'
      שָׁםּ (_ Sam'||
      שָׁנּ San'
      שָׁןּ (_ San'||
      שָׁסּ Sas'
      שָׁעּ Sa?'
      שָׁפּ Sap'
      שָׁףּ (_ Sap'||
      שָׁצּ Sat's
      שָׁץּ (_ Sat's||
      שָׁקּ Sak'
      שָׁרּ SaQ'
      שָׁשּ SaS'
      שָׁשּׁ SaS'
      שָׁשּׂ Sas'
      שָׁתּ Sat'
      שָׁא (% Se?
      שָׁאא Sa??
      שָׁאב Sa?v
      שָׁאג Sa?g
      שָׁאד Sa?d
      שָׁאה Sa?h
      שָׁאו Sa?v
      שָׁאז Sa?z
      שָׁאח Sa?x
      שָׁאט Sa?t
      שָׁאי Sa?j
      שָׁאכ Sa?X
      שָׁאך (_ Sa?X||
      שָׁאל Sa?l
      שָׁאמ Sa?m
      שָׁאם (_ Sa?m||
      שָׁאנ Sa?n
      שָׁאן (_ Sa?n||
      שָׁאס Sa?s
      שָׁאע Sa??
      שָׁאפ Sa?f
      שָׁאף (_ Sa?f||
      שָׁאצ Sa?ts
      שָׁאץ (_ Sa?ts||
      שָׁאק Sa?k
      שָׁאר Sa?Q
      שָׁאש Sa?S
      שָׁאשׁ Sa?S
      שָׁאשׂ Sa?s
      שָׁאת Sa?t
      שָׁאאּ Sa??'
      שָׁאבּ Sa?B'
      שָׁאגּ Sa?g'
      שָׁאדּ Sa?d'
      שָׁאהּ Sa?h'
      שָׁאוּ Sa?v'
      שָׁאזּ Sa?z'
      שָׁאחּ Sa?x'
      שָׁאטּ Sa?t'
      שָׁאיּ Sa?j'
      שָׁאכּ Sa?k'
      שָׁאךּ (_ Sa?k'||
      שָׁאלּ Sa?l'
      שָׁאמּ Sa?m'
      שָׁאםּ (_ Sa?m'||
      שָׁאנּ Sa?n'
      שָׁאןּ (_ Sa?n'||
      שָׁאסּ Sa?s'
      שָׁאעּ Sa??'
      שָׁאפּ Sa?p'
      שָׁאףּ (_ Sa?p'||
      שָׁאצּ Sa?t's
      שָׁאץּ (_ Sa?t's||
      שָׁאקּ Sa?k'
      שָׁארּ Sa?Q'
      שָׁאשּ Sa?S'
      שָׁאשּׁ Sa?S'
      שָׁאשּׂ Sa?s'
      שָׁאתּ Sa?t'
      שָׁה (% Se?
      שָׁהא Sah?
      שָׁהב Sahv
      שָׁהג Sahg
      שָׁהד Sahd
      שָׁהה Sahh
      שָׁהו Sahv
      שָׁהז Sahz
      שָׁהח Sahx
      שָׁהט Saht
      שָׁהי Sahj
      שָׁהכ SahX
      שָׁהך (_ SahX||
      שָׁהל Sahl
      שָׁהמ Sahm
      שָׁהם (_ Sahm||
      שָׁהנ Sahn
      שָׁהן (_ Sahn||
      שָׁהס Sahs
      שָׁהע Sah?
      שָׁהפ Sahf
      שָׁהף (_ Sahf||
      שָׁהצ Sahts
      שָׁהץ (_ Sahts||
      שָׁהק Sahk
      שָׁהר SahQ
      שָׁהש SahS
      שָׁהשׁ SahS
      שָׁהשׂ Sahs
      שָׁהת Saht
      שָׁהאּ Sah?'
      שָׁהבּ SahB'
      שָׁהגּ Sahg'
      שָׁהדּ Sahd'
      שָׁההּ Sahh'
      שָׁהוּ Sahv'
      שָׁהזּ Sahz'
      שָׁהחּ Sahx'
      שָׁהטּ Saht'
      שָׁהיּ Sahj'
      שָׁהכּ Sahk'
      שָׁהךּ (_ Sahk'||
      שָׁהלּ Sahl'
      שָׁהמּ Sahm'
      שָׁהםּ (_ Sahm'||
      שָׁהנּ Sahn'
      שָׁהןּ (_ Sahn'||
      שָׁהסּ Sahs'
      שָׁהעּ Sah?'
      שָׁהפּ Sahp'
      שָׁהףּ (_ Sahp'||
      שָׁהצּ Saht's
      שָׁהץּ (_ Saht's||
      שָׁהקּ Sahk'
      שָׁהרּ SahQ'
      שָׁהשּ SahS'
      שָׁהשּׁ SahS'
      שָׁהשּׂ Sahs'
      שָׁהתּ Saht'
      שָׁי (% Se?
      שָׁיא Sai?
      שָׁיב Saiv
      שָׁיג Saig
      שָׁיד Said
      שָׁיה Saih
      שָׁיו Saiv
      שָׁיז Saiz
      שָׁיח Saix
      שָׁיט Sait
      שָׁיי Saij
      שָׁיכ SaiX
      שָׁיך (_ SaiX||
      שָׁיל Sail
      שָׁימ Saim
      שָׁים (_ Saim||
      שָׁינ Sain
      שָׁין (_ Sain||
      שָׁיס Sais
      שָׁיע Sai?
      שָׁיפ Saif
      שָׁיף (_ Saif||
      שָׁיצ Saits
      שָׁיץ (_ Saits||
      שָׁיק Saik
      שָׁיר SaiQ
      שָׁיש SaiS
      שָׁישׁ SaiS
      שָׁישׂ Sais
      שָׁית Sait
      שָׁיאּ Sai?'
      שָׁיבּ SaiB'
      שָׁיגּ Saig'
      שָׁידּ Said'
      שָׁיהּ Saih'
      שָׁיוּ Saiv'
      שָׁיזּ Saiz'
      שָׁיחּ Saix'
      שָׁיטּ Sait'
      שָׁייּ Saij'
      שָׁיכּ Saik'
      שָׁיךּ (_ Saik'||
      שָׁילּ Sail'
      שָׁימּ Saim'
      שָׁיםּ (_ Saim'||
      שָׁינּ Sain'
      שָׁיןּ (_ Sain'||
      שָׁיסּ Sais'
      שָׁיעּ Sai?'
      שָׁיפּ Saip'
      שָׁיףּ (_ Saip'||
      שָׁיצּ Sait's
      שָׁיץּ (_ Sait's||
      שָׁיקּ Saik'
      שָׁירּ SaiQ'
      שָׁישּ SaiS'
      שָׁישּׁ SaiS'
      שָׁישּׂ Sais'
      שָׁיתּ Sait'
      שֳׁ (% Se?
      שֳׁא Sa?
      שֳׁב Sav
      שֳׁג Sag
      שֳׁד Sad
      שֳׁה Sah
      שֳׁו Sav
      שֳׁז Saz
      שֳׁח Sax
      שֳׁט Sat
      שֳׁי Saj
      שֳׁכ SaX
      שֳׁך (_ SaX||
      שֳׁל Sal
      שֳׁמ Sam
      שֳׁם (_ Sam||
      שֳׁנ San
      שֳׁן (_ San||
      שֳׁס Sas
      שֳׁע Sa?
      שֳׁפ Saf
      שֳׁף (_ Saf||
      שֳׁצ Sats
      שֳׁץ (_ Sats||
      שֳׁק Sak
      שֳׁר SaQ
      שֳׁש SaS
      שֳׁשׁ SaS
      שֳׁשׂ Sas
      שֳׁת Sat
      שֳׁאּ Sa?'
      שֳׁבּ SaB'
      שֳׁגּ Sag'
      שֳׁדּ Sad'
      שֳׁהּ Sah'
      שֳׁוּ Sav'
      שֳׁזּ Saz'
      שֳׁחּ Sax'
      שֳׁטּ Sat'
      שֳׁיּ Saj'
      שֳׁכּ Sak'
      שֳׁךּ (_ Sak'||
      שֳׁלּ Sal'
      שֳׁמּ Sam'
      שֳׁםּ (_ Sam'||
      שֳׁנּ San'
      שֳׁןּ (_ San'||
      שֳׁסּ Sas'
      שֳׁעּ Sa?'
      שֳׁפּ Sap'
      שֳׁףּ (_ Sap'||
      שֳׁצּ Sat's
      שֳׁץּ (_ Sat's||
      שֳׁקּ Sak'
      שֳׁרּ SaQ'
      שֳׁשּ SaS'
      שֳׁשּׁ SaS'
      שֳׁשּׂ Sas'
      שֳׁתּ Sat'
      שֳׁא (% Se?
      שֳׁאא Sa??
      שֳׁאב Sa?v
      שֳׁאג Sa?g
      שֳׁאד Sa?d
      שֳׁאה Sa?h
      שֳׁאו Sa?v
      שֳׁאז Sa?z
      שֳׁאח Sa?x
      שֳׁאט Sa?t
      שֳׁאי Sa?j
      שֳׁאכ Sa?X
      שֳׁאך (_ Sa?X||
      שֳׁאל Sa?l
      שֳׁאמ Sa?m
      שֳׁאם (_ Sa?m||
      שֳׁאנ Sa?n
      שֳׁאן (_ Sa?n||
      שֳׁאס Sa?s
      שֳׁאע Sa??
      שֳׁאפ Sa?f
      שֳׁאף (_ Sa?f||
      שֳׁאצ Sa?ts
      שֳׁאץ (_ Sa?ts||
      שֳׁאק Sa?k
      שֳׁאר Sa?Q
      שֳׁאש Sa?S
      שֳׁאשׁ Sa?S
      שֳׁאשׂ Sa?s
      שֳׁאת Sa?t
      שֳׁאאּ Sa??'
      שֳׁאבּ Sa?B'
      שֳׁאגּ Sa?g'
      שֳׁאדּ Sa?d'
      שֳׁאהּ Sa?h'
      שֳׁאוּ Sa?v'
      שֳׁאזּ Sa?z'
      שֳׁאחּ Sa?x'
      שֳׁאטּ Sa?t'
      שֳׁאיּ Sa?j'
      שֳׁאכּ Sa?k'
      שֳׁאךּ (_ Sa?k'||
      שֳׁאלּ Sa?l'
      שֳׁאמּ Sa?m'
      שֳׁאםּ (_ Sa?m'||
      שֳׁאנּ Sa?n'
      שֳׁאןּ (_ Sa?n'||
      שֳׁאסּ Sa?s'
      שֳׁאעּ Sa??'
      שֳׁאפּ Sa?p'
      שֳׁאףּ (_ Sa?p'||
      שֳׁאצּ Sa?t's
      שֳׁאץּ (_ Sa?t's||
      שֳׁאקּ Sa?k'
      שֳׁארּ Sa?Q'
      שֳׁאשּ Sa?S'
      שֳׁאשּׁ Sa?S'
      שֳׁאשּׂ Sa?s'
      שֳׁאתּ Sa?t'
      שֳׁה (% Se?
      שֳׁהא Sah?
      שֳׁהב Sahv
      שֳׁהג Sahg
      שֳׁהד Sahd
      שֳׁהה Sahh
      שֳׁהו Sahv
      שֳׁהז Sahz
      שֳׁהח Sahx
      שֳׁהט Saht
      שֳׁהי Sahj
      שֳׁהכ SahX
      שֳׁהך (_ SahX||
      שֳׁהל Sahl
      שֳׁהמ Sahm
      שֳׁהם (_ Sahm||
      שֳׁהנ Sahn
      שֳׁהן (_ Sahn||
      שֳׁהס Sahs
      שֳׁהע Sah?
      שֳׁהפ Sahf
      שֳׁהף (_ Sahf||
      שֳׁהצ Sahts
      שֳׁהץ (_ Sahts||
      שֳׁהק Sahk
      שֳׁהר SahQ
      שֳׁהש SahS
      שֳׁהשׁ SahS
      שֳׁהשׂ Sahs
      שֳׁהת Saht
      שֳׁהאּ Sah?'
      שֳׁהבּ SahB'
      שֳׁהגּ Sahg'
      שֳׁהדּ Sahd'
      שֳׁההּ Sahh'
      שֳׁהוּ Sahv'
      שֳׁהזּ Sahz'
      שֳׁהחּ Sahx'
      שֳׁהטּ Saht'
      שֳׁהיּ Sahj'
      שֳׁהכּ Sahk'
      שֳׁהךּ (_ Sahk'||
      שֳׁהלּ Sahl'
      שֳׁהמּ Sahm'
      שֳׁהםּ (_ Sahm'||
      שֳׁהנּ Sahn'
      שֳׁהןּ (_ Sahn'||
      שֳׁהסּ Sahs'
      שֳׁהעּ Sah?'
      שֳׁהפּ Sahp'
      שֳׁהףּ (_ Sahp'||
      שֳׁהצּ Saht's
      שֳׁהץּ (_ Saht's||
      שֳׁהקּ Sahk'
      שֳׁהרּ SahQ'
      שֳׁהשּ SahS'
      שֳׁהשּׁ SahS'
      שֳׁהשּׂ Sahs'
      שֳׁהתּ Saht'
      שֳׁי (% Se?
      שֳׁיא Sai?
      שֳׁיב Saiv
      שֳׁיג Saig
      שֳׁיד Said
      שֳׁיה Saih
      שֳׁיו Saiv
      שֳׁיז Saiz
      שֳׁיח Saix
      שֳׁיט Sait
      שֳׁיי Saij
      שֳׁיכ SaiX
      שֳׁיך (_ SaiX||
      שֳׁיל Sail
      שֳׁימ Saim
      שֳׁים (_ Saim||
      שֳׁינ Sain
      שֳׁין (_ Sain||
      שֳׁיס Sais
      שֳׁיע Sai?
      שֳׁיפ Saif
      שֳׁיף (_ Saif||
      שֳׁיצ Saits
      שֳׁיץ (_ Saits||
      שֳׁיק Saik
      שֳׁיר SaiQ
      שֳׁיש SaiS
      שֳׁישׁ SaiS
      שֳׁישׂ Sais
      שֳׁית Sait
      שֳׁיאּ Sai?'
      שֳׁיבּ SaiB'
      שֳׁיגּ Saig'
      שֳׁידּ Said'
      שֳׁיהּ Saih'
      שֳׁיוּ Saiv'
      שֳׁיזּ Saiz'
      שֳׁיחּ Saix'
      שֳׁיטּ Sait'
      שֳׁייּ Saij'
      שֳׁיכּ Saik'
      שֳׁיךּ (_ Saik'||
      שֳׁילּ Sail'
      שֳׁימּ Saim'
      שֳׁיםּ (_ Saim'||
      שֳׁינּ Sain'
      שֳׁיןּ (_ Sain'||
      שֳׁיסּ Sais'
      שֳׁיעּ Sai?'
      שֳׁיפּ Saip'
      שֳׁיףּ (_ Saip'||
      שֳׁיצּ Sait's
      שֳׁיץּ (_ Sait's||
      שֳׁיקּ Saik'
      שֳׁירּ SaiQ'
      שֳׁישּ SaiS'
      שֳׁישּׁ SaiS'
      שֳׁישּׂ Sais'
      שֳׁיתּ Sait'
      שַׁ (% Se?
      שַׁא Sa?
      שַׁב Sav
      שַׁג Sag
      שַׁד Sad
      שַׁה Sah
      שַׁו Sav
      שַׁז Saz
      שַׁח Sax
      שַׁט Sat
      שַׁי Saj
      שַׁכ SaX
      שַׁך (_ SaX||
      שַׁל Sal
      שַׁמ Sam
      שַׁם (_ Sam||
      שַׁנ San
      שַׁן (_ San||
      שַׁס Sas
      שַׁע Sa?
      שַׁפ Saf
      שַׁף (_ Saf||
      שַׁצ Sats
      שַׁץ (_ Sats||
      שַׁק Sak
      שַׁר SaQ
      שַׁש SaS
      שַׁשׁ SaS
      שַׁשׂ Sas
      שַׁת Sat
      שַׁאּ Sa?'
      שַׁבּ SaB'
      שַׁגּ Sag'
      שַׁדּ Sad'
      שַׁהּ Sah'
      שַׁוּ Sav'
      שַׁזּ Saz'
      שַׁחּ Sax'
      שַׁטּ Sat'
      שַׁיּ Saj'
      שַׁכּ Sak'
      שַׁךּ (_ Sak'||
      שַׁלּ Sal'
      שַׁמּ Sam'
      שַׁםּ (_ Sam'||
      שַׁנּ San'
      שַׁןּ (_ San'||
      שַׁסּ Sas'
      שַׁעּ Sa?'
      שַׁפּ Sap'
      שַׁףּ (_ Sap'||
      שַׁצּ Sat's
      שַׁץּ (_ Sat's||
      שַׁקּ Sak'
      שַׁרּ SaQ'
      שַׁשּ SaS'
      שַׁשּׁ SaS'
      שַׁשּׂ Sas'
      שַׁתּ Sat'
      שַׁא (% Se?
      שַׁאא Sa??
      שַׁאב Sa?v
      שַׁאג Sa?g
      שַׁאד Sa?d
      שַׁאה Sa?h
      שַׁאו Sa?v
      שַׁאז Sa?z
      שַׁאח Sa?x
      שַׁאט Sa?t
      שַׁאי Sa?j
      שַׁאכ Sa?X
      שַׁאך (_ Sa?X||
      שַׁאל Sa?l
      שַׁאמ Sa?m
      שַׁאם (_ Sa?m||
      שַׁאנ Sa?n
      שַׁאן (_ Sa?n||
      שַׁאס Sa?s
      שַׁאע Sa??
      שַׁאפ Sa?f
      שַׁאף (_ Sa?f||
      שַׁאצ Sa?ts
      שַׁאץ (_ Sa?ts||
      שַׁאק Sa?k
      שַׁאר Sa?Q
      שַׁאש Sa?S
      שַׁאשׁ Sa?S
      שַׁאשׂ Sa?s
      שַׁאת Sa?t
      שַׁאאּ Sa??'
      שַׁאבּ Sa?B'
      שַׁאגּ Sa?g'
      שַׁאדּ Sa?d'
      שַׁאהּ Sa?h'
      שַׁאוּ Sa?v'
      שַׁאזּ Sa?z'
      שַׁאחּ Sa?x'
      שַׁאטּ Sa?t'
      שַׁאיּ Sa?j'
      שַׁאכּ Sa?k'
      שַׁאךּ (_ Sa?k'||
      שַׁאלּ Sa?l'
      שַׁאמּ Sa?m'
      שַׁאםּ (_ Sa?m'||
      שַׁאנּ Sa?n'
      שַׁאןּ (_ Sa?n'||
      שַׁאסּ Sa?s'
      שַׁאעּ Sa??'
      שַׁאפּ Sa?p'
      שַׁאףּ (_ Sa?p'||
      שַׁאצּ Sa?t's
      שַׁאץּ (_ Sa?t's||
      שַׁאקּ Sa?k'
      שַׁארּ Sa?Q'
      שַׁאשּ Sa?S'
      שַׁאשּׁ Sa?S'
      שַׁאשּׂ Sa?s'
      שַׁאתּ Sa?t'
      שַׁה (% Se?
      שַׁהא Sah?
      שַׁהב Sahv
      שַׁהג Sahg
      שַׁהד Sahd
      שַׁהה Sahh
      שַׁהו Sahv
      שַׁהז Sahz
      שַׁהח Sahx
      שַׁהט Saht
      שַׁהי Sahj
      שַׁהכ SahX
      שַׁהך (_ SahX||
      שַׁהל Sahl
      שַׁהמ Sahm
      שַׁהם (_ Sahm||
      שַׁהנ Sahn
      שַׁהן (_ Sahn||
      שַׁהס Sahs
      שַׁהע Sah?
      שַׁהפ Sahf
      שַׁהף (_ Sahf||
      שַׁהצ Sahts
      שַׁהץ (_ Sahts||
      שַׁהק Sahk
      שַׁהר SahQ
      שַׁהש SahS
      שַׁהשׁ SahS
      שַׁהשׂ Sahs
      שַׁהת Saht
      שַׁהאּ Sah?'
      שַׁהבּ SahB'
      שַׁהגּ Sahg'
      שַׁהדּ Sahd'
      שַׁההּ Sahh'
      שַׁהוּ Sahv'
      שַׁהזּ Sahz'
      שַׁהחּ Sahx'
      שַׁהטּ Saht'
      שַׁהיּ Sahj'
      שַׁהכּ Sahk'
      שַׁהךּ (_ Sahk'||
      שַׁהלּ Sahl'
      שַׁהמּ Sahm'
      שַׁהםּ (_ Sahm'||
      שַׁהנּ Sahn'
      שַׁהןּ (_ Sahn'||
      שַׁהסּ Sahs'
      שַׁהעּ Sah?'
      שַׁהפּ Sahp'
      שַׁהףּ (_ Sahp'||
      שַׁהצּ Saht's
      שַׁהץּ (_ Saht's||
      שַׁהקּ Sahk'
      שַׁהרּ SahQ'
